src/morphology/stems/suffixes.lexc
LEXICON SUFFIX
!! Examples:
!!€gt-norm: Suffixes
!!€ banaaniaaltoinen: banaani+N+Sg+Nom#aaltoinen+A+Sg+Nom # banana waveful

-aaltoinen%+A:aaltoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-aatteinen%+A:aattei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-aiheinen%+A:aihei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-aineinen%+A:ainei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-aineksinen%+A:aineksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-aistinen%+A:aisti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-ajatuksinen%+A:ajatuksi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-akselinen%+A:akseli    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-alkuinen%+A:alkui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-aloitteinen%+A:aloittei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-alueinen%+A:aluei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-annoksinen%+A:annoksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-arominen%+A:aromi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-aseinen%+A:asei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-asenteinen%+A:asentei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-asentoinen%+A:asentoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-askelinen%+A:askeli    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-asteelainen%+A:asteelai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-asteikkoinen%+A:asteikkoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-asteinen%+A:astei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-asuinen%+A:asui    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-avioinen%+A:avioi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-avioisuus%+N:avioisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-avusteinen%+A:avustei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-ehtoinen%+A:ehtoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-ehtoisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:ehtoisesti PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-ehtoisuus%+N:ehtoisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-eleinen%+A:elei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-eleisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:eleisesti   PCLE_TYHMÄSTI   ;
-eleisyys%+N:eleisyy    NOUN_KÖYHYYS   ;
-enemmistöinen%+A:enemmistöi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-energiainen%+A:energiai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-enteinen%+A:entei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-esteinen%+A:estei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-fosfaattinen%+A:fosfaatti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-frekvenssinen%+A:frekvenssi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-haiveninen%+A:haiveni  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-hakuinen%+A:hakui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-hakuisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:hakuisesti PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-hakuisuus%+N:hakuisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-halkioinen%+A:halkioi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-hameinen%+A:hamei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-hammasteinen%+A:hammastei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-hammastuksinen%+A:hammastuksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-hampainen%+A:hampai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-hankaiminen%+A:hankaimi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-hankainen%+A:hankai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-hapsuinen%+A:hapsui    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-harjainen%+A:harjai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-harjaksinen%+A:harjaksi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-harteinen%+A:hartei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-hartiainen%+A:hartiai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-heimoinen%+A:heimoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-heittoinen%+A:heittoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-helainen%+A:helai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-helmainen%+A:helmai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-henkinen%+A:henki  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-hermoinen%+A:hermoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-hermoisuus%+N:hermoisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-heteinen%+A:hetei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-hetkinen%+A:hetki  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-hevosvoimainen%+A:hevosvoimai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-hihainen%+A:hihai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-hiilinen%+A:hiili  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-himoinen%+A:himoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-hipiäinen%+A:hipiäi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-hiuksinen%+A:hiuksi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-hoitoinen%+A:hoitoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-hoitoisuus%+N:hoitoisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-holvinen%+A:holvi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-housuinen%+A:housui    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-huippuinen%+A:huippui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-huoneinen%+A:huonei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-huulinen%+A:huuli  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-häiriöinen%+A:häiriöi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-häntäinen%+A:häntäi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-ihoinen%+A:ihoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-ikkunainen%+A:ikkunai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-ikäisyys%+N:ikäisyy    NOUN_KÖYHYYS   ;
-ilkinen%+A:ilki    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-ilmastoinen%+A:ilmastoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-intoinen%+A:intoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-iskuinen%+N:iskui  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN ;
-jakoinen%+A:jakoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-jaksoinen%+A:jaksoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-jalkainen%+A:jalkai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-johtoinen%+A:johtoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-joukkueinen%+A:joukkuei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-jousinen%+N:jousi  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN ;
-juoksuinen%+A:juoksui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-jussi%+N:juss  NOUN_RUUVI ;
-juurinen%+A:juuri  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-järkinen%+A:järki  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-järvinen%+A:järvi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-jäseninen%+A:jäseni    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-jäähdytteinen%+A:jäähdyttei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-kaarinen%+A:kaari  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kaateinen%+A:kaatei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kahvainen%+A:kahvai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kaikuinen%+A:kaikui    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kaistainen%+A:kaistai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kaliiberinen%+A:kaliiberi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kaliiperinen%+A:kaliiperi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kalloinen%+A:kalloi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kalorinen%+A:kalori    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kamarinen%+A:kamari    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kammioinen%+A:kammioi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kansinen%+A:kansi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kantainen%+A:kantai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kantaisuus%+N:kantaisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-kantinen%+A:kanti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-karaattinen%+A:karaatti    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-karvainen%+A:karvai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kasvoinen%+A:kasvoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kasvuinen%+A:kasvui    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kasvuisuus%+N:kasvuisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-katseinen%+A:katsei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-katseisuus%+N:katseisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-kattoinen%+A:kattoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kaulainen%+A:kaulai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kauluksinen%+A:kauluksi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kaupalla%+Pcle%+Adv:kaupalla   PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-kaupalla%+Pcle:kaupalla    PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-kautinen%+A:kauti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kehyksinen%+A:kehyksi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-kehysteinen%+A:kehystei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-kenkäinen%+A:kenkäi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-kertainen%+A:kertai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kertaisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:kertaisesti   PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-kertaistaa%+V:kertaist VERB_MUTRISTAA ;
-kertaistua%+V:kertaistu    VERB_KAUNISTUA ;
-kielinen%+A:kieli  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-kielisyys%+N:kielisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS   ;
-kierroksinen%+A:kierroksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kiihkoinen%+A:kiihkoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kiiltoinen%+A:kiiltoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kiinnitteinen%+A:kiinnittei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-kiinnityksinen%+A:kiinnityksi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-kiloinen%+A:kiloi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kinttuinen%+N:kinttui  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN ;
-kiristeinen%+A:kiristei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-kirjaiminen%+A:kirjaimi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kirjoinen%+A:kirjoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kirjontainen%+A:kirjontai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kiskoinen%+A:kiskoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kohtainen%+A:kohtai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kohtaisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:kohtaisesti   PCLE_NOPEASTI   ;
-kohtaisuus%+N:kohtaisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-koipinen%+A:koipi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kokkainen%+A:kokkai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-koneinen%+A:konei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-koristeinen%+A:koristei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-korkoinen%+A:korkoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-korsinen%+A:korsi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kortinen%+A:korti  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-korvainen%+A:korvai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kourainen%+A:kourai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kudoksinen%+A:kudoksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kudontainen%+A:kudontai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kuinen%+A:kui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kukintainen%+A:kukintai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kukintoinen%+A:kukintoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kulkuinen%+A:kulkui    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kulmainen%+A:kulmai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kulmio%+N:kulmio   NOUN_TUOMIO    ;
-kuntoinen%+A:kuntoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kuonoinen%+A:kuonoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kuorinen%+A:kuori  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kuosinen%+A:kuosi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kupeinen%+A:kupei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kupolinen%+A:kupoli    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kurkkuinen%+A:kurkkui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kutoinen%+A:kutoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kutrinen%+A:kutri  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kutuinen%+A:kutui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kuumenteinen%+A:kuumentei  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kuutioinen%+A:kuutioi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-kykyinen%+A:kykyi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-kylkinen%+A:kylki  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-kymmeninen%+A:kymmeni  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-kymppinen%+A:kymppi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-kyntinen%+A:kynti  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-kynäinen%+A:kynäi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-kyttyräinen%+A:kyttyräi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-kärkinen%+A:kärki  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-käsitteinen%+A:käsittei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-kätinen%+A:käti    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-kätisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:kätisesti   PCLE_TYHMÄSTI   ;
-käynnisteinen%+A:käynnistei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-käyntinen%+A:käynti    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-käyttöinen%+A:käyttöi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-käytöksinen%+A:käytöksi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-käänteinen%+A:kääntei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-laaksoinen%+A:laaksoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-laatuisuus%+N:laatuisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-lahjainen%+N:lahjai    NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN ;
-lahjaisuus%+N:lahjaisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-lahkeinen%+N:lahkei    NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN ;
-lainoitteinen%+A:lainoittei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-laivainen%+A:laivai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-lajinen%+A:laji    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-lakinen%+A:laki    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-lakkinen%+A:lakki  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-lankainen%+N:lankai    NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN ;
-lanteinen%+A:lantei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-lantioinen%+A:lantioi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-lapainen%+A:lapai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-lapsinen%+A:lapsi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-laskoksinen%+A:laskoksi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-laskuinen%+A:laskui    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-latvainen%+A:latvai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-latvuksinen%+A:latvuksi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-lauseinen%+A:lausei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-lavainen%+A:lavai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-lehdykkäinen%+A:lehdykkäi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-lehtinen%+A:lehti  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-lehväinen%+A:lehväi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-leimainen%+A:leimai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-lentoinen%+A:lentoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-leukainen%+A:leukai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-levikkinen%+A:levikki  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-levintäinen%+A:levintäi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-levyinen%+A:levyi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-liepeinen%+A:liepei    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-lierinen%+A:lieri  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-liikenteinen%+A:liikentei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-liikkeinen%+A:liikkei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-liikkeisyys%+N:liikkeisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS   ;
-linjainen%+A:linjai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-litrainen%+A:litrai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-loiminen%+A:loimi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-lokeroinen%+A:lokeroi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-loppuinen%+A:loppui    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-luistoinen%+A:luistoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-luokkainen%+A:luokkai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-luokkaisuus%+N:luokkaisuu  NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-luokkalainen%+N:luokkalai  NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN ;
-luuloinen%+A:luuloi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-luuloisuus%+N:luuloisuu    NOUN_AAKKOSELLISUUS    ;
-luustoinen%+A:luustoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-lypsyinen%+A:lypsyi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-lyöntinen%+A:lyönti    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-lähtöinen%+A:lähtöi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-lähtöisyys%+N:lähtöisyy    NOUN_KÖYHYYS   ;
-lämmitteinen%+A:lämmittei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-maalinen%+A:maali  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-maastoinen%+A:maastoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-mahainen%+A:mahai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-maineinen%+A:mainei    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-markkanen%+N:markka    NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN ;
-mastoinen%+A:mastoi    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-mastoinen%+N:mastoi    NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN ;
-matkainen%+A:matkai    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-menekkinen%+A:menekki  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-merkintäinen%+A:merkintäi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-merkityksinen%+A:merkityksi    ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-merkityksisyys%+N:merkityksisyy    NOUN_KÖYHYYS   ;
-metri%+N:metr  NOUN_TYYLI ;
-mielinen%+A:mieli  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-mielisesti%+Pcle%+Adv%+Der%/sti:mielisesti PCLE_TYHMÄSTI   ;
-mielisyys%+N:mielisyy  NOUN_KÖYHYYS   ;
-mietteinen%+A:miettei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN ;
-mikko%+N:mik   NOUN_UKKO  ;
-minuuttinen%+A:minuutti    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-mittakaavainen%+A:mittakaavai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
-moottorinen%+A:moottori    ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
